Utah statutes.
70D-2-302.   Notice required with loan application.
(1)  If the following is the case, a lender and broker shall notify in writing
a person from whom the lender or broker receives or for whom the lender or
broker prepares a written application for a mortgage loan that:
(a)  the mortgage loan applied for may be sold or assigned;
(b)  the servicing of the loan may be sold or assigned; and
(c)  the mortgage loan will not necessarily be held or serviced by the lender
that originates the mortgage loan.
(2)  A lender and broker shall provide a written notice required by this
section at the time of receipt or preparation of the written application for a
mortgage loan.
